Idaho statutes. Title 40 HIGHWAYS AND BRIDGES
Chapter 24
LOCAL HIGHWAY TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE COUNCIL

Sec.

§ 40-2401. Local highway technical assistance council.

A local highway technical assistance council is hereby created. The council shall be a public agency, and is the instrumentality of its member jurisdictions. The council and its officers and employees shall not be subject to the administrative or management control of the Idaho transportation department.

The council shall consist of nine (9) members, three (3) each to be appointed by the association of Idaho cities, Idaho association of counties, and the Idaho association of highway districts. Council members shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority.

Members of the council may be entitled to compensation for services at a rate not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day as determined by the members’ respective associations and actual and necessary expenses. Payment of an honorarium as provided in this subsection shall not be considered salary as defined in section 59-1302(31), Idaho Code. Compensation and reimbursement shall be made from the local highway technical assistance council accounts established in section 40-717, Idaho Code.

§ 40-2402. Council organization — Personnel.

The offices of the council shall be maintained in Ada county, and the members shall meet and organize as soon as all appointments have been made, or as provided in section 40-2401, Idaho Code. At the initial meeting, and each year thereafter, the members shall, by a majority vote of the total membership, elect a chairman and a vice chairman.

The council shall meet quarterly for regular business sessions, and at such other times at the call of the chairman, or at the request of any three (3) members.

The council may appoint a local highway administrator and fix his compensation, and the administrator shall hold office at the pleasure of the council. The administrator shall serve as secretary and executive officer of the council and carry out such duties as are delegated by the council. The council may employ other personnel, prescribe duties, and fix compensation.

§ 40-2403. Authority of the council.

The council shall have the authority to:

Represent its member jurisdictions in conferences, meetings and hearings related to highways, roads and streets and other transportation factors affecting local highway jurisdictions;

Develop uniform standards and procedures that may be recommended to its member jurisdictions for the construction, maintenance, use, operation and administration of local highways;

Cooperate with and receive and expend aid and donations from the federal or state governments, and from other sources for the administration and operation of the council;

Make recommendations to the Idaho transportation board for the distribution and prioritization of federal funds for local highway projects;

Assist the legislature by providing research and data relating to transportation matters affecting local highway jurisdictions within the state;

Maintain and disseminate information to local highway jurisdictions of federal and state legislation and administrative rules and regulations affecting local highway jurisdictions;

Maintain and disseminate information to local highway jurisdictions of activities relating to ground transportation in other states;

When authorized by the participating local jurisdiction, to act for that local jurisdiction through a joint exercise of powers agreement with any other local jurisdiction, and any agency of the state of Idaho, or any agency of the federal government;

Buy, sell, receive and exchange property, both real and personal, as necessary to perform its functions;

Be the sole and exclusive authority for the expenditure of the moneys made available by appropriation or otherwise to the council.

§ 40-2404. Council fiscal year — Annual report.

The fiscal year for the local highway technical assistance council shall be July 1 through June 30. On an annual basis, the council shall issue a report outlining its activities for the previous year, including a financial statement. Copies of the report shall be provided to the members of the transportation committees of the legislature.

§ 40-2405. Fiscal audits.

The council shall perform fiscal audits in accordance with the provisions of section 67-450B, Idaho Code.